Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2422
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-2422 to 71-2430 shall be known and may be cited as the Cancer Drug Repository Program Act.

Laws 2003, LB 756, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 331, § 1.